Utah statutes.
9-4-625.   Financial assistance from federal government permitted.
(1)  In addition to the powers conferred upon an authority by other provisions
of this part, an authority  may:
(a)  borrow money or accept contributions, grants, or other financial
assistance from the federal government in aid of any project or related
activities concerning health, welfare, economic, educational, environmental,
and similar problems of persons of medium and low income;
(b)  take over or lease or manage any project or undertaking constructed or
owned by the federal government; and
(c)  to these ends, comply with conditions and enter into contracts,
covenants, mortgages, trust indentures, leases, or agreements considered
necessary, convenient, or desirable.
(2)  It is the purpose and intent of this part to authorize any authority to
do all things necessary or desirable to secure the financial aid or
cooperation of the federal government in the provision of decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings and maintaining a wholesome living environment for persons
of medium and low income.  To accomplish this purpose an authority may include
in any contract for financial assistance with the federal government any
provisions that the federal government may require as conditions to its
financial aid not inconsistent with the purposes of this part.
